Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-875
County; acquisition of property in adjoining state.

Any county in Nebraska, in exercising any of the powers granted to any county by sections 39-855 to 39-876, is authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, any real estate or personal property located in an adjoining state, for the purpose of building, constructing or completing the construction of such bridge.

Laws 1935, c. 87, § 12, p. 284;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2111;

R.S.1943, § 39-875.